fr: Type de pièce pour tapis de course: Adaptateur; Module Bluetooth; Console; Superposition de la console; Carte de contrôle; Plateau; Superposition de plateau; Embout; Main courante; Kit de matériel; Moteur d'inclinaison; Clé; Moteur de levage; Carte de contrôle inférieure; Moteur; Courroie de moteur; Cordon d'alimentation; Rail; Rouleau; Courroie de course; Clé de sécurité; Amortisseur/vérin; Capteur de vitesse; Ressort/isolateur; Carte de contrôle supérieure; Module wifi; Faisceau de câbles; Autre
fi: Juoksumaton osan tyyppi: Sovitin; Bluetooth-moduuli; Konsoli; Konsolin peitekalvo; Ohjauskortti; Juoksualusta; Juoksualustan peitekalvo; Päätytulppa; Käsipuu; Laitteistosarja; Kaltevuusmoottori; Avain; Nostomoottori; Alempi ohjauskortti; Moottori; Moottorin hihna; Virtajohto; Kisko; Rulla; Juoksuhihna; Turva-avain; Iskunvaimennin/joustintuki; Nopeusanturi; Jousi/eristin; Ylempi ohjauskortti; WiFi-moduuli; Johtosarja; Muu
sk-SK: Typ časti bežeckého pásu: Adaptér; Modul Bluetooth; Konzola; Prekrytie konzoly; Riadiaca doska; Doska; Prekrytie dosky; Koncovka; Rukoväť; Súprava hardvéru; Motor sklonu; Kľúč; Zdvíhací motor; Spodná riadiaca doska; Motor; Remeň motora; Napájací kábel; Koľajnička; Valec; Bežecký pás; Bezpečnostný kľúč; Tlmič/vzpera; Snímač rýchlosti; Pružina/izolátor; Horná riadiaca doska; Modul Wi-Fi; Káblový zväzok; Iné
nb: Type tredemølledel: Adapter; Bluetooth-modul; Konsoll; Konsolloverlegg; Kontrollkort; Dekk; Dekkoverlegg; Endestykke; Håndløper; Maskinvaresett; Hellingsmotor; Nøkkel; Løftemotor; Nedre kontrollkort; Motor; Motorreim; Strømledning; Skinne; Rulle; Løpebånd; Sikkerhetsnøkkel; Støtdemper; Fartssensor; Fjær/isolator; Øvre kontrollkort; Wifi-modul; Ledningsnett; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta dijela trake za trčanje: Adapter; Bluetooth modul; Konzola; Prekrivni element konzole; Upravljačka ploča; Podloga; Prekrivni element podloge; Završna kapa; Rukohvat; Hardverski komplet; Motor za nagib; Ključ; Motor za podizanje; Donja upravljačka ploča; Motor; Remen motora; Kabel za napajanje; Vodilica; Valjak; Remen za trčanje; Sigurnosni ključ; Amortizer/nosač; Senzor brzine; Opruga/izolator; Gornja upravljačka ploča; Wi-Fi modul; Ožičenje; Ostalo
zh-TW: 跑步機零件類型: 變壓器; 藍牙模組; 控制台; 控制台覆膜; 控制板; 跑板; 跑板覆膜; 端蓋; 扶手; 硬體套件; 坡度馬達; 鑰匙; 升降馬達; 下控制板; 馬達; 馬達皮帶; 電源線; 軌道; 滾筒; 跑步帶; 安全鎖; 避震器/支柱; 速度感測器; 彈簧/避震墊; 上控制板; WiFi 模組; 線束; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de peça para passadeira: Adaptador; Módulo de Bluetooth; Consola; Revestimento de consola; Painel de controlo; Plataforma; Revestimento de plataforma; Tampa de extremidade; Corrimão; Kit de hardware; Motor de inclinação; Chave; Motor de elevação; Placa de controlo inferior; Motor; Correia do motor; Cabo de alimentação; Calha; Rolo; Tapete de corrida; Chave de segurança; Amortecedor/suporte; Sensor de velocidade; Mola/isolador; Placa de controlo superior; Módulo Wi-Fi; Cablagem; Outro
en: Treadmill part type: Adapter; Bluetooth module; Console; Console overlay; Control board; Deck; Deck overlay; End cap; Handrail; Hardware kit; Incline motor; Key; Lift motor; Lower control board; Motor; Motor belt; Power cord; Rail; Roller; Running belt; Safety key; Shock/strut; Speed sensor; Spring/isolator; Upper control board; WiFi module; Wire harness; Other
it: Tipo di parte del tapis roulant: Adattatore; Modulo Bluetooth; Console; Sovrapposizione per console; Scheda di controllo; Pedana; Rivestimento della pedana; Tappo terminale; Corrimano; Kit hardware; Motore di inclinazione; Chiave; Motore di sollevamento; Scheda di controllo inferiore; Motore; Cinghia del motore; Cavo di alimentazione; Binario; Rullo; Nastro da corsa; Chiave di sicurezza; Ammortizzatore/montante; Sensore di velocità; Molla/isolatore; Scheda di controllo superiore; Modulo Wi-Fi; Cablaggio; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de peça da esteira: Adaptador; Módulo Bluetooth; Console; Sobreposição do console; Placa de controle; Plataforma; Sobreposição da plataforma; Tampa da extremidade; Corrimão; Kit de ferragens; Motor de inclinação; Chave; Motor de elevação; Placa de controle inferior; Motor; Correia do motor; Cabo de alimentação; Trilho; Rolo; Lona de corrida; Chave de segurança; Amortecedor/braço suspensor; Sensor de velocidade; Mola/isolador; Placa de controle superior; Módulo Wi-Fi; Chicote elétrico; Outro
lt-LT: Bėgimo takelių dalies tipas: Adapteris; „Bluetooth“ modulis; Konsolė; Konsolės perdanga; Valdymo plokštė; Platforma; Platformos perdanga; Galinis dangtelis; Turėklas; Tvirtinimo elementų rinkinys; Nuolydžio variklis; Raktas; Kėlimo variklis; Apatinė valdymo plokštė; Variklis; Variklio diržas; Maitinimo laidas; Bėgelis; Volas; Bėgimo takelio juosta; Saugos raktas; Amortizatorius / atrama; Greičio jutiklis; Spyruoklė / izoliatorius; Viršutinė valdymo plokštė; WiFi modulis; Laidų pynė; Kita
ru: Тип детали беговой дорожки: Адаптер; Модуль Bluetooth; Консоль; Накладка консоли; Плата управления; Дека; Покрытие деки; Торцевая заглушка; Поручень; Комплект оборудования; Мотор наклона; Ключ; Мотор подъема; Нижняя плата управления; Мотор; Ремень мотора; Кабель питания; Направляющая; Ролик; Беговое полотно; Ключ безопасности; Амортизатор/стойка; Датчик скорости; Пружина/изолятор; Верхняя плата управления; Модуль WiFi; Жгут проводов; Другое
da: Reservedelstype til løbebånd: Adapter; Bluetooth-modul; Konsol; Konsoloverlejring; Kontrolpanel; Løbeplade; Overlejring til løbeplade; Endekappe; Gelænder; Hardwaresæt; Hældningsmotor; Nøgle; Løftemotor; Nederste kontrolpanel; Motor; Motorrem; Strømkabel; Skinne; Rulle; Løbebånd; Sikkerhedsnøgle; Støddæmper/fjederben; Hastighedssensor; Fjeder/isolator; Øverste kontrolpanel; Wi-fi-modul; Ledningsnet; Andet
sv: Typ av löpbandkomponent: Adapter; Bluetooth-modul; Konsol; Konsolöverlagring; Styrkort; Löpbord; Löpbordsöverlagring; Ändstycke; Handledare; Maskinvarukit; Lutningsmotor; Nyckel; Lyftmotor; Nedre styrkort; Motor; Motorrem; Strömsladd; Skena; Vals; Löpband; Säkerhetsnyckel; Stötdämpare/fjäderben; Hastighetssensor; Fjäder/isolator; Övre styrkort; Wifi-modul; Kabelstam; Övrigt
pl: Typ części bieżni: Zasilacz; Moduł Bluetooth; Konsola; Nakładka na konsolę; Płyta sterująca; Płyta biegowa; Nakładka na płytę biegową; Zaślepka; Poręcz; Zestaw sprzętowy; Silnik nachylenia; Klucz; Silnik podnoszenia; Dolna płyta sterująca; Silnik; Pas napędowy; Przewód zasilający; Szyna; Rolka; Pas biegowy; Klucz bezpieczeństwa; Amortyzator / podpora; Czujnik prędkości; Sprężyna / izolator; Górna płyta sterująca; Moduł Wi-Fi; Wiązka przewodów; Inne
th: ประเภทชิ้นส่วนลู่วิ่ง: อะแดปเตอร์; โมดูลบลูทูธ; คอนโซล; แผ่นปิดคอนโซล; แผงควบคุม; เด็ค; แผ่นปิดเด็ค; ฝาปิดปลาย; ราวจับ; ชุดเครื่องมือฮาร์ดแวร์; มอเตอร์ปรับความชัน; คีย์; มอเตอร์ยก; แผงควบคุมส่วนล่าง; มอเตอร์; สายพานมอเตอร์; สายไฟ; ราง; ลูกกลิ้ง; สายพานวิ่ง; คีย์นิรภัย; โช้ค/สตรัท; เซ็นเซอร์วัดความเร็ว; สปริง/ตัวแยก; แผงควบคุมส่วนบน; โมดูล WiFi; ชุดสายไฟ; อื่นๆ
ko: 트레드밀 부품 유형: 어댑터; 블루투스 모듈; 콘솔; 콘솔 오버레이; 제어 보드; 데크; 데크 오버레이; 엔드 캡; 난간; 하드웨어 키트; 인클라인 모터; 키; 리프트 모터; 하단 제어 보드; 모터; 모터 벨트; 전원 코드; 레일; 롤러; 런닝 벨트; 안전 키; 쇼크/스트럿; 속도 센서; 스프링/절연체; 상단 제어 보드; Wi-Fi 모듈; 와이어 하니스; 기타
cs: Typ dílu běžeckého pásu: Adaptér; Bluetooth modul; Konzola; Panel konzoly; Řídicí deska; Deska; Kryt desky; Koncovka; Zábradlí; Sada spojovacího materiálu; Motor zdvihu; Klíč; Zvedací motor; Spodní řídicí deska; Motor; Řemen motoru; Napájecí kabel; Lišta; Válec; Běžecký pás; Bezpečnostní klíč; Tlumič/vzpěra; Senzor rychlosti; Pružina/izolátor; Horní řídicí deska; Wi-Fi modul; Kabelový svazek; Jiné
zh-CN: 跑步机零件类型: 适配器; 蓝牙模块; 控制台; 控制台覆膜; 控制板; 跑步板; 跑步板覆膜; 端盖; 扶手; 硬件套装; 坡度电机; 钥匙; 升降电机; 下控板; 电机; 电机皮带; 电源线; 边条; 滚筒; 跑步带; 安全锁; 减震器/支柱; 速度传感器; 弹簧/隔离器; 上控板; Wi-Fi 模块; 线束; 其他
el: Τύπος εξαρτήματος διαδρόμου: Προσαρμογέας; Μονάδα Bluetooth; Κονσόλα; Επικάλυψη κονσόλας; Πλακέτα ελέγχου; Δάπεδο; Επικάλυψη δαπέδου; Καπάκι άκρου; Χειρολισθήρας; Κιτ υλικού εξοπλισμού; Μοτέρ κλίσης; Κλειδί; Μοτέρ ανύψωσης; Κάτω πλακέτα ελέγχου; Μοτέρ; Ιμάντας μοτέρ; Καλώδιο ρεύματος; Ράγα; Ράουλο; Ιμάντας τρεξίματος; Κλειδί ασφαλείας; Αμορτισέρ; Αισθητήρας ταχύτητας; Ελατήριο/απομονωτής; Άνω πλακέτα ελέγχου; Μονάδα WiFi; Πλεξούδα καλωδίων; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип част за бягаща пътека: Адаптер; Bluetooth модул; Конзола; Покритие на конзолата; Контролна платка; Платформа; Покритие на платформата; Крайна капачка; Ръкохватка; Комплект крепежни елементи; Мотор за наклон; Ключ; Мотор за повдигане; Долна контролна платка; Мотор; Ремък на мотора; Захранващ кабел; Релса; Ролка; Лента за бягане; Ключ за безопасност; Амортисьор/подпора; Сензор за скорост; Пружина/изолатор; Горна контролна платка; WiFi модул; Кабелен сноп; Друго
nl: Type loopbandonderdeel: Adapter; Bluetooth-module; Console; Console-overlay; Besturingspaneel; Loopdek; Loopdek-overlay; Einddop; Leuning; Hardwarekit; Hellingsmotor; Sleutel; Hefmotor; Onderste besturingspaneel; Motor; Motoraandrijfriem; Stroomsnoer; Rail; Roller; Loopband; Veiligheidssleutel; Schokdemper/veer; Snelheidssensor; Veer/isolator; Bovenste besturingspaneel; Wifi-module; Kabelboom; Overig
sl-SI: Vrsta dela za tekalno stezo: Adapter; Modul Bluetooth; Konzola; Prekrivni sloj konzole; Nadzorna plošča; Plošča; Prekrivni sloj tekalne plošče; Zaključni pokrovček; Opiralo; Komplet strojne opreme; Motor za naklon; Ključ; Dvižni motor; Spodnja nadzorna plošča; Motor; Jermen motorja; Napajalni kabel; Tirnica; Valj; Tekalni trak; Varnostni ključ; Amortizer/vzmetna noga; Senzor hitrosti; Vzmet/izolator; Zgornja nadzorna plošča; Modul za brezžični internet; Kabelski snop; Drugo
vi: Loại linh kiện máy chạy bộ: Bộ chuyển đổi; Mô-đun Bluetooth; Bảng điều khiển; Mặt ốp bảng điều khiển; Bo mạch điều khiển; Ván trượt; Mặt ốp ván trượt; Nắp chụp cuối; Tay vịn; Bộ dụng cụ; Động cơ nâng dốc; Khóa; Động cơ nâng; Bo mạch điều khiển dưới; Động cơ; Dây curoa động cơ; Dây nguồn; Đường ray; Con lăn; Băng tải; Khóa an toàn; Giảm xóc/thanh chống; Cảm biến tốc độ; Lò xo/bộ cách ly; Bo mạch điều khiển trên; Mô-đun WiFi; Bộ dây điện; Khác
ja: トレッドミル部品タイプ: アダプター; Bluetooth モジュール; コンソール; コンソールオーバーレイ; コントロールボード; デッキ; デッキオーバーレイ; エンドキャップ; ハンドレール; ハードウェアキット; インクラインモーター; キー; リフトモーター; 下部コントロールボード; モーター; モーターベルト; 電源コード; レール; ローラー; ランニングベルト; セーフティキー; ショック / ストラット; スピードセンサー; スプリング / アイソレーター; 上部コントロールボード; Wi-Fi モジュール; ワイヤーハーネス; その他
tr: Koşu bandı parça tipi: Adaptör; Bluetooth modülü; Konsol; Konsol kaplaması; Kontrol paneli; Platform; Platform kaplaması; Uç kapağı; Tutunma kolu; Donanım kiti; Eğim motoru; Anahtar; Kaldırma motoru; Alt kontrol paneli; Motor; Motor kayışı; Güç kablosu; Ray; Merdane; Koşu bandı kayışı; Güvenlik anahtarı; Amortisör/destek; Hız sensörü; Yay/izolatör; Üst kontrol paneli; WiFi modülü; Kablo tesisatı; Diğer
hu: Futópad típusa: Adapter; Bluetooth-modul; Konzol; Konzolborítás; Vezérlőpanel; Futólap; Futólap borítás; Zárókupak; Korlát; Hardverkészlet; Dőlésszög-állító motor; Kulcs; Emelőmotor; Alsó vezérlőpanel; Motor; Hajtószíj; Tápkábel; Sín; Görgő; Futószalag; Biztonsági kulcs; Lengéscsillapító/rugóstag; Sebességérzékelő; Rugó/szigetelő; Felső vezérlőpanel; Wifi-modul; Kábelköteg; Egyéb
es: Tipo de pieza para cinta de correr: Adaptador; Módulo Bluetooth; Consola; Sobreposición de consola; Tablero de control; Plataforma; Sobreposición de plataforma; Tapa del extremo; Pasamanos; Kit de equipos; Motor de inclinación; Llave; Motor de elevación; Tablero de control inferior; Motor; Correa del motor; Cable de alimentación; Riel; Rodillo; Banda de correr; Llave de seguridad; Amortiguador/puntal; Sensor de velocidad; Resorte/aislador; Tablero de control superior; Módulo wifi; Arnés de cables; Otra
de: Art des Laufbandersatzteils: Adapter; Bluetooth-Modul; Konsole; Konsolen-Overlay; Steuerplatine; Laufdeck; Deck-Overlay; Endkappe; Handlauf; Hardware-Paket; Steigungsmotor; Schlüssel; Hubmotor; Untere Steuerplatine; Motor; Antriebsriemen; Netzkabel; Schiene; Rolle; Laufgurt; Sicherheitsschlüssel; Dämpfer/Federbein; Geschwindigkeitssensor; Feder/Isolator; Obere Steuerplatine; WLAN-Modul; Kabelbaum; Sonstige
ro-RO: Tip de piesă pentru banda de alergat: Adaptor; Modul Bluetooth; Consolă; Strat de acoperire consolă; Placă de control; Platformă; Strat de acoperire platformă; Capac de capăt; Bară de susținere; Kit de feronerie; Motor pentru înclinare; Cheie; Motor de ridicare; Placă de control inferioară; Motor; Curea de motor; Cablu de alimentare; Șină; Rolă; Bandă de alergare; Cheie de siguranță; Amortizor; Senzor de viteză; Arc/izolator; Placă de control superioară; Modul WiFi; Cablaj; Altele